Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.461

Form of contribution.

A contribution of a partner may consist of tangible or intangible property or other benefit to the limited partnership, including money, services performed, promissory notes, other agreements to contribute cash or property, and contracts for services to be performed.

[ 2009 c 188 s 501.]